Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6311
Governmental body; contract with nonlicensee prohibited.

No state agency, county, city, village, school district, or other political subdivision shall accept a bid in connection with any asbestos project which is two hundred sixty or more linear feet or one hundred sixty or more square feet and linear feet in any combination from a business entity which does not hold a license from the department at the time the bid is submitted.

Laws 1986, LB 1051, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 77.